Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

[§583A-101] Short title. This chapter
may be cited as the Uniform Child-Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act. [L
2002, c 124, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next